Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 342 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby created the Department of Workers' Claims administratively attached to the Office of the
Governor, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the
Senate in accordance with Section 6 of this Act.
(2) The department shall be divided for administrative purposes into the:
(a) Office of the Commissioner;
(b) Office of General Counsel;
(c) Office of Administrative Law Judges;
(d) Division of Claims Processing;
(e) Division of Security and Compliance;
(f) Division of Workers' Compensation Funds; and
(g) Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
(3) The Office of Administrative Law Judges shall be headed by a chief administrative law judge appointed in
accordance with Section 7 of this Act.
(4) Each division in the department shall be headed by a director appointed by the commissioner with the
approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050.
(5) The Workers' Compensation Board shall be attached to the Department of Workers' Claims for
administrative purposes only.
Section 2. KRS 342.0011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Injury" means any work-related traumatic event or series of traumatic events, including cumulative trauma,
arising out of and in the course of employment which is the proximate cause producing a harmful change in
the human organism evidenced by objective medical findings. "Injury" does not include the effects of the
natural aging process, and does not include any communicable disease unless the risk of contracting the
disease is increased by the nature of the employment. "Injury" when used generally, unless the context
indicates otherwise, shall include an occupational disease and damage to a prosthetic appliance, but shall not
include a psychological, psychiatric, or stress-related change in the human organism, unless it is a direct result
of a physical injury;
(2) "Occupational disease" means a disease arising out of and in the course of the employment;
(3) An occupational disease as defined in this chapter shall be deemed to arise out of the employment if there is
apparent to the rational mind, upon consideration of all the circumstances, a causal connection between the
conditions under which the work is performed and the occupational disease, and which can be seen to have
followed as a natural incident to the work as a result of the exposure occasioned by the nature of the
employment and which can be fairly traced to the employment as the proximate cause. The occupational
disease shall be incidental to the character of the business and not independent of the relationship of employer
and employee. An occupational disease need not have been foreseen or expected but, after its contraction, it
must appear to be related to a risk connected with the employment and to have flowed from that source as a
rational consequence;
(4) "Injurious exposure" shall mean that exposure to occupational hazard which would, independently of any other
cause whatsoever, produce or cause the disease for which the claim is made;
(5) "Death" means death resulting from an injury or occupational disease;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) "Carrier" means any insurer, or legal representative thereof, authorized to insure the liability of employers
under this chapter and includes a self-insurer;
(7) "Self-insurer" is an employer who has been authorized under the provisions of this chapter to carry his own
liability on his employees covered by this chapter;
(8) "Department" means the Department of Workers' Claims administratively attached to the office of the
Governor[in the Education and Labor Cabinet];
(9) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workers' Claims[ under the direction and
supervision of the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet];
(10) "Board" means the Workers' Compensation Board;
(11) (a) "Temporary total disability" means the condition of an employee who has not reached maximum
medical improvement from an injury and has not reached a level of improvement that would permit a
return to employment;
(b) "Permanent partial disability" means the condition of an employee who, due to an injury, has a
permanent disability rating but retains the ability to work; and
(c) "Permanent total disability" means the condition of an employee who, due to an injury, has a permanent
disability rating and has a complete and permanent inability to perform any type of work as a result of
an injury, except that total disability shall be irrebuttably presumed to exist for an injury that results in:
1. Total and permanent loss of sight in both eyes;
2. Loss of both feet at or above the ankle;
3. Loss of both hands at or above the wrist;
4. Loss of one (1) foot at or above the ankle and the loss of one (1) hand at or above the wrist;
5. Permanent and complete paralysis of both arms, both legs, or one (1) arm and one (1) leg;
6. Incurable insanity or imbecility; or
7. Total loss of hearing;
(12) "Income benefits" means payments made under the provisions of this chapter to the disabled worker or his
dependents in case of death, excluding medical and related benefits;
(13) "Medical and related benefits" means payments made for medical, hospital, burial, and other services as
provided in this chapter, other than income benefits;
(14) "Compensation" means all payments made under the provisions of this chapter representing the sum of income
benefits and medical and related benefits;
(15) "Medical services" means medical, surgical, dental, hospital, nursing, and medical rehabilitation services,
medicines, and fittings for artificial or prosthetic devices;
(16) "Person" means any individual, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, firm, association,
trust, joint venture, corporation, or legal representative thereof;
(17) "Wages" means, in addition to money payments for services rendered, the reasonable value of board, rent,
housing, lodging, fuel, or similar advantages received from the employer, and gratuities received in the course
of employment from persons other than the employer as evidenced by the employee's federal and state tax
returns;
(18) "Agriculture" means the operation of farm premises, including the planting, cultivation, producing, growing,
harvesting, and preparation for market of agricultural or horticultural commodities thereon, the raising of
livestock for food products and for racing purposes, and poultry thereon, and any work performed as an
incident to or in conjunction with the farm operations, including the sale of produce at on-site markets and the
processing of produce for sale at on-site markets. It shall not include the commercial processing, packing,
drying, storing, or canning of such commodities for market, or making cheese or butter or other dairy products
for market;
(19) "Beneficiary" means any person who is entitled to income benefits or medical and related benefits under this
chapter;

CHAPTER 61 3
(20) "United States," when used in a geographic sense, means the several states, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Canal Zone, and the territories of the United States;
(21) "Alien" means a person who is not a citizen, a national, or a resident of the United States or Canada. Any
person not a citizen or national of the United States who relinquishes or is about to relinquish his residence in
the United States shall be regarded as an alien;
(22) "Insurance carrier" means every insurance carrier or insurance company authorized to do business in the
Commonwealth writing workers' compensation insurance coverage and includes the Kentucky Employers
Mutual Insurance Authority and every self-insured group operating under the provisions of this chapter;
(23) (a) "Severance or processing of coal" means all activities performed in the Commonwealth at underground,
auger, and surface mining sites; all activities performed at tipple or processing plants that clean, break,
size, or treat coal; and all activities performed at coal loading facilities for trucks, railroads, and barges.
Severance or processing of coal shall not include acts performed by a final consumer if the acts are
performed at the site of final consumption.
(b) "Engaged in severance or processing of coal" shall include all individuals, partnerships, limited
partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, joint ventures, associations, or any other
business entity in the Commonwealth which has employees on its payroll who perform any of the acts
stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection, regardless of whether the acts are performed as owner of the
coal or on a contract or fee basis for the actual owner of the coal. A business entity engaged in the
severance or processing of coal, including but not limited to administrative or selling functions, shall be
considered wholly engaged in the severance or processing of coal for the purpose of this chapter.
However, a business entity which is engaged in a separate business activity not related to coal, for
which a separate premium charge is not made, shall be deemed to be engaged in the severance or
processing of coal only to the extent that the number of employees engaged in the severance or
processing of coal bears to the total number of employees. Any employee who is involved in the
business of severing or processing of coal and business activities not related to coal shall be prorated
based on the time involved in severance or processing of coal bears to his total time;
(24) "Premium" for every self-insured group means any and all assessments levied on its members by such group
or contributed to it by the members thereof. For special fund assessment purposes, "premium" also includes
any and all membership dues, fees, or other payments by members of the group to associations or other entities
used for underwriting, claims handling, loss control, premium audit, actuarial, or other services associated with
the maintenance or operation of the self-insurance group;
(25) (a) "Premiums received" for policies effective on or after January 1, 1994, for insurance companies means
direct written premiums as reported in the annual statement to the Department of Insurance by
insurance companies, except that "premiums received" includes premiums charged off or deferred, and,
on insurance policies or other evidence of coverage with provisions for deductibles, the calculated cost
for coverage, including experience modification and premium surcharge or discount, prior to any
reduction for deductibles. The rates, factors, and methods used to calculate the cost for coverage under
this paragraph for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage with provisions for deductibles shall
be the same rates, factors, and methods normally used by the insurance company in Kentucky to
calculate the cost for coverage for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage without provisions
for deductibles, except that, for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage with provisions for
deductibles effective on or after January 1, 1995, the calculated cost for coverage shall not include any
schedule rating modification, debits, or credits. For policies with provisions for deductibles with
effective dates on or after January 1, 1995, assessments shall be imposed on premiums received as
calculated by the deductible program adjustment. The cost for coverage calculated under this paragraph
by insurance companies that issue only deductible insurance policies in Kentucky shall be actuarially
adequate to cover the entire liability of the employer for compensation under this chapter, including all
expenses and allowances normally used to calculate the cost for coverage. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates of May 6, 1993, through December 31, 1993, for which the
insurance company did not report premiums and remit special fund assessments based on the calculated
cost for coverage prior to the reduction for deductibles, "premiums received" includes the initial
premium plus any reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, and fees charged under the
deductibles. The special fund assessment rates in effect for reimbursements invoiced for losses,
expenses, or fees charged under the deductibles shall be those percentages in effect on the effective date
of the insurance policy. For policies covering covered employees having a co-employment relationship
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
with a professional employer organization and a client as defined in KRS Chapter 336, "premiums
received" means premiums calculated using the experience modification factor of each client as defined
in KRS Chapter 336 for each covered employee for that portion of the payroll pertaining to the covered
employee.
(b) "Direct written premium" for insurance companies means the gross premium written less return
premiums and premiums on policies not taken but including policy and membership fees.
(c) "Premium," for policies effective on or after January 1, 1994, for insurance companies means all
consideration, whether designated as premium or otherwise, for workers' compensation insurance paid
to an insurance company or its representative, including, on insurance policies with provisions for
deductibles, the calculated cost for coverage, including experience modification and premium surcharge
or discount, prior to any reduction for deductibles. The rates, factors, and methods used to calculate the
cost for coverage under this paragraph for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage with
provisions for deductibles shall be the same rates, factors, and methods normally used by the insurance
company in Kentucky to calculate the cost for coverage for insurance policies or other evidence of
coverage without provisions for deductibles, except that, for insurance policies or other evidence of
coverage with provisions for deductibles effective on or after January 1, 1995, the calculated cost for
coverage shall not include any schedule rating modifications, debits, or credits. For policies with
provisions for deductibles with effective dates on or after January 1, 1995, assessments shall be
imposed as calculated by the deductible program adjustment. The cost for coverage calculated under
this paragraph by insurance companies that issue only deductible insurance policies in Kentucky shall
be actuarially adequate to cover the entire liability of the employer for compensation under this chapter,
including all expenses and allowances normally used to calculate the cost for coverage. For policies
with provisions for deductibles with effective dates of May 6, 1993, through December 31, 1993, for
which the insurance company did not report premiums and remit special fund assessments based on the
calculated cost for coverage prior to the reduction for deductibles, "premium" includes the initial
consideration plus any reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, or fees charged under the
deductibles.
(d) "Return premiums" for insurance companies means amounts returned to insureds due to endorsements,
retrospective adjustments, cancellations, dividends, or errors.
(e) "Deductible program adjustment" means calculating premium and premiums received on a gross basis
without regard to the following:
1. Schedule rating modifications, debits, or credits;
2. Deductible credits; or
3. Modifications to the cost of coverage from inception through and including any audit that are
based on negotiated retrospective rating arrangements, including but not limited to large risk
alternative rating options;
(26) "Insurance policy" for an insurance company or self-insured group means the term of insurance coverage
commencing from the date coverage is extended, whether a new policy or a renewal, through its expiration,
not to exceed the anniversary date of the renewal for the following year;
(27) "Self-insurance year" for a self-insured group means the annual period of certification of the group created
pursuant to KRS 342.350(4) and 304.50-010;
(28) "Premium" for each employer carrying his own risk pursuant to KRS 342.340(1) shall be the projected value
of the employer's workers' compensation claims for the next calendar year as calculated by the commissioner
using generally-accepted actuarial methods as follows:
(a) The base period shall be the earliest three (3) calendar years of the five (5) calendar years immediately
preceding the calendar year for which the calculation is made. The commissioner shall identify each
claim of the employer which has an injury date or date of last injurious exposure to the cause of an
occupational disease during each one (1) of the three (3) calendar years to be used as the base, and shall
assign a value to each claim. The value shall be the total of the indemnity benefits paid to date and
projected to be paid, adjusted to current benefit levels, plus the medical benefits paid to date and
projected to be paid for the life of the claim, plus the cost of medical and vocational rehabilitation paid
to date and projected to be paid. Adjustment to current benefit levels shall be done by multiplying the
weekly indemnity benefit for each claim by the number obtained by dividing the statewide average

CHAPTER 61 5
weekly wage which will be in effect for the year for which the premium is being calculated by the
statewide average weekly wage in effect during the year in which the injury or date of the last exposure
occurred. The total value of the claims using the adjusted weekly benefit shall then be calculated by the
commissioner. Values for claims in which awards have been made or settlements reached because of
findings of permanent partial or permanent total disability shall be calculated using the mortality and
interest discount assumptions used in the latest available statistical plan of the advisory rating
organization defined in Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 304. The sum of all calculated values shall be
computed for all claims in the base period;
(b) The commissioner shall obtain the annual payroll for each of the three (3) years in the base period for
each employer carrying his own risk from records of the department and from the records of the
Department of Workforce Development, Education and Labor Cabinet. The commissioner shall
multiply each of the three (3) years of payroll by the number obtained by dividing the statewide average
weekly wage which will be in effect for the year in which the premium is being calculated by the
statewide average weekly wage in effect in each of the years of the base period;
(c) The commissioner shall divide the total of the adjusted claim values for the three (3) year base period
by the total adjusted payroll for the same three (3) year period. The value so calculated shall be
multiplied by 1.25 and shall then be multiplied by the employer's most recent annualized payroll,
calculated using records of the department and the Department of Workforce Development data which
shall be made available for this purpose on a quarterly basis as reported, to obtain the premium for the
next calendar year for assessment purposes under KRS 342.122;
(d) For November 1, 1987, through December 31, 1988, premium for each employer carrying its own risk
shall be an amount calculated by the board pursuant to the provisions contained in this subsection and
such premium shall be provided to each employer carrying its own risk and to the funding commission
on or before January 1, 1988. Thereafter, the calculations set forth in this subsection shall be performed
annually, at the time each employer applies or renews its application for certification to carry its own
risk for the next twelve (12) month period and submits payroll and other data in support of the
application. The employer and the funding commission shall be notified at the time of the certification
or recertification of the premium calculated by the commissioner, which shall form the employer's basis
for assessments pursuant to KRS 342.122 for the calendar year beginning on January 1 following the
date of certification or recertification;
(e) If an employer having fewer than five (5) years of doing business in this state applies to carry its own
risk and is so certified, its premium for the purposes of KRS 342.122 shall be based on the lesser
number of years of experience as may be available including the two (2) most recent years if necessary
to create a three (3) year base period. If the employer has less than two (2) years of operation in this
state available for the premium calculation, then its premium shall be the greater of the value obtained
by the calculation called for in this subsection or the amount of security required by the commissioner
pursuant to KRS 342.340(1);
(f) If an employer is certified to carry its own risk after having previously insured the risk, its premium
shall be calculated using values obtained from claims incurred while insured for as many of the years of
the base period as may be necessary to create a full three (3) year base. After the employer is certified to
carry its own risk and has paid all amounts due for assessments upon premiums paid while insured, the
employer shall be assessed only upon the premium calculated under this subsection;
(g) "Premium" for each employer defined in KRS 342.630(2) shall be calculated as set forth in this
subsection; and
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, the premium of any employer authorized to
carry its own risk for purposes of assessments due under this chapter shall be no less than thirty cents
($0.30) per one hundred dollars ($100) of the employer's most recent annualized payroll for employees
covered by this chapter;
(29) "SIC code" as used in this chapter means the Standard Industrial Classification Code contained in the latest
edition of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual published by the Federal Office of Management and
Budget;
(30) "Investment interest" means any pecuniary or beneficial interest in a provider of medical services or treatment
under this chapter, other than a provider in which that pecuniary or investment interest is obtained on terms
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
equally available to the public through trading on a registered national securities exchange, such as the New
York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange, or on the National Association of Securities Dealers
Automated Quotation System;
(31) "Managed health care system" means a health care system that employs gatekeeper providers, performs
utilization review, and does medical bill audits;
(32) "Physician" means physicians and surgeons, audiologists holding a doctorate in audiology, psychologists,
optometrists, dentists, podiatrists, and osteopathic and chiropractic practitioners acting within the scope of the
license or other credentials required by his or her specialty of practice in the United States jurisdiction in
which he or she is authorized to practice;
(33) "Objective medical findings" means information gained through direct observation and testing of the patient
applying objective or standardized methods;
(34) "Work" means providing services to another in return for remuneration on a regular and sustained basis in a
competitive economy;
(35) "Permanent impairment rating" means percentage of whole body impairment caused by the injury or
occupational disease as determined by the "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment";
(36) "Permanent disability rating" means the permanent impairment rating selected by an administrative law judge
times the factor set forth in the table that appears at KRS 342.730(1)(b); and
(37) "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment" means, except as provided in KRS 342.262:
(a) The fifth edition published by the American Medical Association; and
(b) For psychological impairments, Chapter 12 of the second edition published by the American Medical
Association.
Section 3. KRS 342.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created the Division of Workers' Compensation Funds in the Department of Workers' Claims
that[which] shall be responsible for the administration of the special fund and the coal workers'
pneumoconiosis fund and the maintenance of records regarding the payment of claims by these funds. The
Division of Workers' Compensation Funds shall have no responsibility for the coal workers' pneumoconiosis
fund once the assets and liabilities have been transferred to the Kentucky Employers' Mutual Insurance
Authority, which will administer the fund pursuant to KRS 342.1243. The Division of Workers' Compensation
Funds shall be headed by a director appointed by the commissioner[secretary of the Education and Labor
Cabinet], with the prior written approval of the Governor pursuant to KRS 12.050. The director shall be
responsible for overseeing the administration of the funds and the maintenance of records regarding the
payment of claims by the funds.
(2) The special fund shall have no liability upon any claim in which the injury occurred, or for cumulative trauma,
the disability became manifest, or, for occupational disease, if the date of injury or last exposure occurred,
after December 12, 1996.
(3) Where the employer has settled its liability for income benefits and thereafter a determination has been made
of the special fund's liability, the special fund portion of the benefit rate shall be paid over the maximum
period provided for by statute for that disability, with the period of payment beginning on the date settlement
was approved by an administrative law judge. This provision is remedial and shall apply to all pending and
future claims.
Section 4. KRS 342.122 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For calendar year 1997 and for each calendar year thereafter, for the purpose of funding and prefunding
the liabilities of the special fund, financing the administration and operation of the Kentucky Workers'
Compensation Funding Commission, and financing the expenditures for all programs in the Department
of Workers' Claims, Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission, Workers' Compensation
Nominating Committee, Department of Workplace Standards, except expenditures for the Division of
Wages and Hours contained in the Department of Workplace Standards and the proportional support for
general administration and support based on an approved indirect cost allocation plan within the
Department of Workers' Claims and the Education and Labor Cabinet, as reflected in the enacted
budget of the Commonwealth and enacted by the General Assembly, the funding commission shall
impose a special fund assessment rate of nine percent (9%) upon the amount of workers' compensation

CHAPTER 61 7
premiums received on and after January 1, 1997, through December 31, 1997, by every insurance
carrier writing workers' compensation insurance in the Commonwealth, by every self-insured group
operating under the provisions of KRS 342.350(4) and Chapter 304, and against the premium, as
defined in KRS 342.0011, of every employer carrying his or her own risk.
(b) 1. The funding commission shall, for calendar year 1998 and thereafter, establish for the special
fund an assessment rate to be assessed against all premium received during that calendar year
which shall produce enough revenue to amortize on a level basis the unfunded liability of the
special fund as of June 30 preceding January 1 of each year, for the period remaining until
December 31, 2029. The special fund assessment imposed by the funding commission shall
continue to be assessed to finance the administration and operation of the Kentucky Workers'
Compensation Funding Commission under subsection (1)(a) of this section, and financing the
expenditures for all programs in the Department of Workers' Claims, Occupational Safety and
Health Review Commission, Department of Workplace Standards, excluding expenditures for
the Division of Wages and Hours contained in the Department of Workplace Standards and
the proportional support for general administration and support based on an approved indirect
cost allocation plan within the Department of Workers' Claims and the Education and Labor
Cabinet.
2. For the purpose of establishing the assessment rate after the liabilities of the special fund have
been funded or prefunded, the Workers' Compensation Funding Commission, the Department
of Workers' Claims, the Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission, the Department
of Workplace Standards, excluding the Division of Wages and Hours contained within the
Department of Workplace Standards, and the Education and Labor Cabinet, shall each submit
a budget to the commissioner for approval. The commissioner shall submit a combined budget
request for use of the special fund assessment, subject to the approval of the Workers'
Compensation Funding Commission, to the chairs of the House Standing Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue. The combined budgets of the Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission,
Department of Workplace Standards, and the proportional support for the general
administration and approved indirect cost allocation to the Education and Labor Cabinet,
shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total combined budget submitted by the
commissioner.
3. The interest rate to be used in this calculation shall reflect the funding commission's investment
experience to date and the current investment policies of the commission. This assessment shall
be imposed upon the amount of workers' compensation premiums received by every insurance
carrier writing workers' compensation insurance in the Commonwealth, by every self-insured
group operating under the provisions of KRS 342.350(4) and Chapter 304, and against the
premium, as defined in KRS 342.0011, of every employer carrying its own risk. On or before
October 1 of each year, the commission shall notify each insurance carrier writing workers'
compensation insurance in the Commonwealth, every group of self-insured employers, and each
employer carrying its own risk, of the rates which shall become effective on January 1 of each
year, unless modified by the General Assembly.
(c) All assessments imposed by this section shall be paid to the Kentucky Workers' Compensation Funding
Commission and shall be credited to the benefit reserve fund within the Kentucky Workers'
Compensation Funding Commission.
(d) The assessments imposed in this chapter shall be in lieu of all other assessments or taxes on workers'
compensation premiums.
(2) (a) These assessments shall be paid quarterly not later than the thirtieth day of the month following the end
of the quarter in which the premium is received. Receipt shall be considered timely through actual
physical receipt or by postmark of the United States Postal Service. Employers carrying their own risk
and employers defined in KRS 342.630(2) shall pay the annual assessments in four (4) equal quarterly
installments.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2020, all assessments shall be electronically remitted to the funding
commission quarterly not later than the thirtieth day of the month following the end of the quarter in
which the premium is received. Receipt shall be considered timely when filed and remitted using the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
appropriate electronic pay system as prescribed by the funding commission. Employers carrying their
own risk and employers defined in KRS 342.630(2) shall pay the annual assessments in four (4) equal
quarterly installments.
(3) The assessments imposed by this section may be collected by the insurance carrier from the insured. However,
the insurance carrier shall not collect from the employer any amount exceeding the assessments imposed
pursuant to this section. If the insurance carrier collects the assessment from an insured, the assessment shall
be collected at the same time and in the same proportion as the premium is collected. The assessment for an
insurance policy or other evidence of coverage providing a deductible may be collected in accordance with this
chapter on a premium amount that equates to the premium that would have applied without the deductible.
Each statement from an insurance carrier presented to an insured reflecting premium and assessment amounts
shall clearly identify and distinguish the amount to be paid for premium and the amount to be paid for
assessments. No insurance carrier shall collect from an insured an amount in excess of the assessment
percentages imposed by this chapter. The assessment for an insurance policy or other evidence of coverage
providing a deductible may be collected in accordance with this chapter on a premium amount that equates to
the premium that would have applied without the deductible. The percentages imposed by this chapter for an
insurance policy issued by an insurance company shall be those percentages in effect on the annual effective
date of the policy, regardless of the date that the premium is actually received by the insurance company.
(4) A self-insured group may elect to report its premiums and to have its assessments computed in the same
manner as insurance companies. This election may not be rescinded for at least ten (10) years, nor may this
election be made a second time for at least another ten (10) years, except that the board of directors of the
funding commission may, at its discretion, waive the ten (10) year ban on a case-by-case basis after formal
petition has been made to the funding commission by a self-insured group.
(5) The funding commission, as part of the collection and auditing of the special fund assessments required by this
section, shall annually require each insurance carrier and each self-insured group to provide a list of employers
which it has insured or which are members and the amount collected from each employer. Additionally, the
funding commission shall require each entity paying a special fund assessment to report the SIC code for each
employer and the amount of premium collected from each SIC code. An insurance carrier or self-insured
group may require its insureds or members to furnish the SIC code for each of their employees. However, the
failure of any employer to furnish said codes shall not relieve the insurance carrier or self-insured group from
the obligation to furnish same to the funding commission. The Department of Workforce Development,
Education and Labor Cabinet, is hereby directed to make available the SIC codes assigned in its records to
specific employers to aid in the reporting and recording of the special fund assessment data.
(6) Each self-insured employer, self-insured group, or insurance carrier shall provide any information and submit
any reports the Department of Revenue or the funding commission may require to effectuate the provisions of
this section. In addition, the funding commission may enter reciprocal agreements with other governmental
agencies for the exchange of information necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.
(7) The special fund shall be required to maintain a central claim registry of all claims to which it is named a
party, giving each such claim a unique claim number and thereafter recording the status of each claim on a
current basis. The registry shall be established by January 26, 1988, for all claims on which payments were
made since July 1, 1986, or which were pending adjudication since July 1, 1986, by audit of all claim files in
the possession of the special fund.
(8) The fund heretofore designated as the subsequent claim fund is abolished, and there is substituted therefor the
special fund as set out by this section, and all moneys and properties owned by the subsequent claim fund are
transferred to the special fund.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section or this chapter to the contrary, the total amount of funds
collected pursuant to the assessment rates adopted by the funding commission shall not be limited to the
provisions of this section.
(10) All assessment rates imposed for periods prior to January 1, 1997, under KRS 342.122 shall forever remain
applicable to premiums received on policies with effective dates prior to January 1, 1997, by every insurance
carrier writing workers' compensation insurance in the Commonwealth, by every self-insured group operating
under the provision of KRS 342.350(4) and Chapter 304, and against the premium, as defined in KRS
342.0011, of every employer carrying its own risk.
Section 5. KRS 342.215 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 61 9
(1) The Workers' Compensation Board is hereby created and established. The board shall rule on appeals of
decisions rendered by administrative law judges under this chapter. The board shall rule on an appeal of a
decision of an administrative law judge no later than sixty (60) days following the date on which the last
appeal brief was filed.
(2) The Workers' Compensation Board shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the Governor. Each
member shall hold no other public office and shall devote his or her full time to the duties of his or her office.
Each member shall be exempt from the classified service, and his or her support staff may be exempt from the
classified service.
(3) Of the members of the board appointed under this section, any member appointed to fill an unexpired term
shall immediately assume the office subject to the confirmation by the Senate in accordance with KRS 11.160
for the remainder of the term. Any member not currently pending reappointment by the Senate with a term
expiring on or before:
(a) December 1, 2025, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2026;
(b) December 1, 2026, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2027; or
(c) December 1, 2027, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2028.
Thereafter, each term of a board member shall run for four (4) years from the date of expiration of the term for
which the member's predecessor was appointed, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the
expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the term. The Governor shall not appoint a
member of the board to fill the unexpired term of another board member, nor shall the Governor reappoint a
member of the board who has been removed from his or her position prior to the expiration of his or her term.
The members of the board shall have the qualifications required of appeals court judges, except for residence
in a district, and shall receive the same salary and shall be subject to the same standards of conduct. The
Governor shall designate a member of the board to serve as chairman. Any vacancy in the chairmanship shall
be filled by the Governor. The Governor may at any time remove any member for cause after furnishing the
member with a written copy of the charges against him or her and giving the member a public hearing if he or
she requests it.
(4) A decision concurred in by any two (2) of the three (3) members shall constitute a decision of the board.
(5) Members of the Workers' Compensation Board and the administrative law judges shall be members of the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System.
(6) The Workers' Compensation Board shall be attached to the Department of Workers' Claims[ in the Education
and Labor Cabinet].
Section 6. KRS 342.228 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Workers' Claims shall be responsible for administering claims and ensuring compliance
with the insurance, self-insurance, and rehabilitation provisions in this chapter. The department shall be
administered by a commissioner appointed by the Governor. The commissioner appointed by the Governor
shall be subject to the consent of the Senate in accordance with KRS 11.160.
(2) The commissioner shall have demonstrated knowledge and experience in the areas of public administration,
administrative law, and workers' compensation by having a minimum of eight (8) years of legal practice
experience in the area of workers' compensation[area of workers' compensation, public administration, and
administrative law].
Section 7. KRS 342.230 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall establish and fill any positions, including medical services and advice, necessary to
carry on the department's work subject to the limits of appropriations for the department and except as
otherwise required by law. All employees of the department shall be classified employees under KRS
Chapter 18A, except for the commissioner, the administrative law judges, and board members. The
commissioner shall have immediate supervision of the employees of the department, perform duties
assigned to him or her, and have complete authority to carry out all the administrative functions relating to
the department.
(2) The commissioner with the assistance of the board shall train and instruct the administrative law judges on an
ongoing basis; assign cases; and monitor the caseloads of the administrative law judges and the Workers'
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Compensation Board to ensure timely disposition of cases; keep and be the custodian of the records of the
board and the administrative law judges; annually report the activities of the board and the administrative law
judges to the Governor; and devote his or her full time to the duties of his or her office. The commissioner
shall be paid a salary not less than the salary of a member of the board.
(3)[(2)] The Governor shall appoint, with the consent of the Senate in accordance with KRS 11.160 for a term
of four (4) years, not more than nineteen (19) administrative law judges, each of whom shall be an attorney
and shall have five (5) years' experience in the Commonwealth in the practice of workers' compensation law or
a related field, and extensive knowledge of workers' compensation law, and shall be paid the same salary as a
Circuit Judge. Each newly appointed administrative law judge shall not assume his or her office until June 1
following confirmation by the Senate. Administrative law judges who are reappointed shall continue to serve
in their capacity until the reappointment is confirmed by the Senate or the Senate adjourns without confirming
the appointment. Each administrative law judge shall be exempt from the classified service, and his or her
support staff may be exempt from the classified service. Each administrative law judge may be employed for
additional terms with the consent of the Senate in accordance with KRS 11.160. The Governor, at least thirty
(30) days prior to the expiration of a term of an administrative law judge, shall provide the name of the
individual whom he or she intends to appoint to the position to the chairman of the Senate Standing Committee
on Economic Development, Tourism, and Labor. These administrative law judges shall conduct hearings, and
otherwise supervise the presentation of evidence and perform any other duties assigned to them by statute and
shall render final decisions, orders, or awards. Administrative law judges may, in receiving evidence, make
rulings affecting the competency, relevancy, and materiality of the evidence about to be presented and upon
motions presented during the taking of evidence as will expedite the preparation of the case.
(4)[(3)] To ensure that the administrative law judges perform their responsibilities competently and issue
decisions consistent with this chapter, the commissioner shall, at least twice annually, conduct training and
education seminars in workers' compensation law; administrative law; and methods and procedures for writing
well-reasoned, clear, correct, and concise opinions, orders, or awards.
(5)[(4)] The Governor may at any time remove the commissioner or any member of the board. The
commissioner may remove any administrative law judge. A member of the board or an administrative law
judge may be removed for good cause, including violation of the code of judicial ethics or the code of ethics
applicable to the executive branch of the Commonwealth. In addition, an administrative law judge or a
member of the board may be removed for the persistent or repeated failure to perform satisfactorily the
specific duties assigned in this chapter, including the requirement of timely disposition of cases, review of
attorney's fees, and failure to attend training and continuing education programs required by this section.
(6)[(5)] Any vacancy in the term of an administrative law judge, which occurs prior to the expiration of the
term, shall be filled if necessary by appointment of the Governor in accordance with subsection (3)[(2)] of this
section within sixty (60) days from the date the vacancy occurs, with the consent of the Senate in accordance
with KRS 11.160, for the remainder of the term. An administrative law judge appointed to fill an unexpired
term shall immediately assume the office subject to the confirmation by the Senate in accordance with KRS
11.160 for the remainder of the term.
(7)[(6)] Any administrative law judge not currently pending confirmation by the Senate with a term expiring on
or before:
(a) December 1, 2025, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2026;
(b) December 1, 2026, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2027;
(c) December 1, 2027, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2028; or
(d) December 1, 2028, shall continue serving a term that shall expire on June 1, 2029.
(8)[(7)] One (1) of the administrative law judges appointed pursuant to this section shall be appointed as a chief
administrative law judge, to have the same qualifications, powers, duties, and requirements as those of other
administrative law judges. The chief administrative law judge shall not be assigned regular dockets but shall
instead assist the commissioner by doing all scheduling of the administrative law judges, handling dockets
assigned to the administrative law judges in case of an emergency, providing supervision of the administrative
law judges, and providing educational opportunities for the administrative law judges. The chief administrative
law judge shall be paid at the same rate as the administrative law judges plus an additional three thousand
dollars ($3,000) per year. At any time the commissioner may replace the chief administrative law judge with
one (1) of the other administrative law judges at which time the former chief administrative law judge shall

CHAPTER 61 11
resume the duties assigned to the other administrative law judges pursuant to this chapter. On January 1, 1998,
the commissioner shall employ a person in this position for a four (4) year term.
Section 8. KRS 342.342 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 342.340, KRS 342.350, or any administrative regulations promulgated
pursuant to those provisions, the commissioner shall annually review the adequacy of the financial or other
security requirements contained in administrative regulations, promulgated pursuant to the individual self-
insurance provisions in this chapter. The commissioner shall report the results of the review to the Economic
Development and Workforce Investment Committee of the General Assembly and any recommendations for
proposed changes to insure the financial soundness of the individual self-insurers authorized pursuant to this
chapter. In addition, the commissioner shall report not less often than annually a summary report on the
financial soundness of the individual self-insurers.
(2) The Economic Development and Workforce Investment Committee of the General Assembly shall annually
review the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to the individual provisions under this chapter.
(3) On July 1, 1994, the Division of Security and Compliance of the Department of Workers' Claims[ in the
Education and Labor Cabinet] shall be expanded by five (5) employees. These additional employees shall be
employed for the purpose of conducting financial audits, examinations, and reviews and other activities
necessary to ensure and monitor the financial soundness of the individual self-insured employers authorized
pursuant to KRS 342.340.
Section 9. KRS 12.020 is amended to read as follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major administrative bodies that they
include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-
inclusive. Every authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or
any other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program cabinet in which they
are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily authorized executive order; except in the case of
the Personnel Board and where the attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and coordination of activities
and shall not include any authority over the functions, personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the
department or administrative body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.

CHAPTER 61 13
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
c. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
d. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
e. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
4. Division of Tobacco, Nicotine, and Vapor Product Licensing.
(e) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(f) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(g) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(h) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.

CHAPTER 61 15
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division – Central and East
Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
6. Kentucky Film Office.
a. Kentucky Film Leadership Council.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.

CHAPTER 61 17
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.

CHAPTER 61 19
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b.[ Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c.] Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
g. Division of Program Policy and Support.
3. Office of Industry and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
b. Division of Workforce Talent.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l)[ Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m)] Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(m)[(n)] Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(n)[(o)] State Labor Relations Board.
(o)[(p)] Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(p)[(q)] Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(q)[(r)] Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(r)[(s)] Office of Educational Programs.
(s)[(t)] Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(t)[(u)] Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(u)[(v)] Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.

CHAPTER 61 21
(v)[(w)] Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(w)[(x)] Department for Disability Determination Services.
1. Division of Operations.
2. Division of Support Services.
3. Division of Specialized Cases.
4. Division of Case Processing.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
(11) Department of Workers' Claims.
(a) Office of the Commissioner.
(b) Office of General Counsel.
(c) Office of Administrative Law Judges.
(d) Division of Claims Processing.
(e) Division of Security and Compliance.
(f) Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
(g) Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
Section 10. KRS 12.023 is amended to read as follows:
The following organizational units and administrative bodies shall be attached to the Office of the Governor:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education;
(2) Department of Military Affairs;
(3) Department for Local Government;
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights;
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women;
(6) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs;
(7) Office of Minority Empowerment;
(a) The Martin Luther King Commission;
(8) Office of Homeland Security;[ and]
(9) Kentucky Communications Network Authority; and
(10) Department of Workers' Claims;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Office of the Commissioner.
(b) Office of General Counsel.
(c) Office of Administrative Law Judges.
(d) Division of Claims Processing.
(e) Division of Security and Compliance.
(f) Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
(g) Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
Section 11. KRS 13A.3441 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly finds that a proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190, relating to utilization review
and medical bill audits, filed with the Commission on February 18, 2021, by the [Labor Cabinet, ]Department
of Workers' Claims, was found deficient on or after March 30, 2021, and before January 4, 2022, but
determined to become effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency pursuant to KRS 13A.330, as
evidenced by records of the Legislative Research Commission.
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding:
(a) If the proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190 referenced in subsection (1) of this section has not been
adopted on or before April 14, 2022, the proposed amendment shall expire as of April 14, 2022; or
(b) If the proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190 referenced in subsection (1) of this section has been
adopted on or before April 14, 2022, 803 KAR 25:190 shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of April
14, 2022.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body
shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the
same as, the proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190 referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period
beginning on January 4, 2022, and concluding on June 1, 2023.
(4) The proposed amendment referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the
office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.
Section 12. KRS 13B.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all administrative hearings conducted by an agency, with the
exception of those specifically exempted under this section. The provisions of this chapter shall supersede any
other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes and administrative regulations, unless exempted under this
section, to the extent these other provisions are duplicative or in conflict. This chapter creates only procedural
rights and shall not be construed to confer upon any person a right to hearing not expressly provided by law.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Investigations, hearings to determine probable cause, or any other type of information gathering or fact
finding activities;
(b) Public hearings required in KRS Chapter 13A for the promulgation of administrative regulations;
(c) Any other public hearing conducted by an administrative agency which is nonadjudicatory in nature and
the primary purpose of which is to seek public input on public policy making;
(d) Military adjudicatory proceedings conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 35;
(e) Administrative hearings conducted by the legislative and judicial branches of state government;
(f) Administrative hearings conducted by any city, county, urban-county, charter county, or special district
contained in KRS Chapters 65 to 109, or any other unit of local government operating strictly in a local
jurisdictional capacity;
(g) Informal hearings which are part of a multilevel hearing process that affords an administrative hearing
at some point in the hearing process if the procedures for informal hearings are approved and
promulgated in accordance with subsections (4) and (5) of this section;
(h) Limited exemptions granted for specific hearing provisions and denoted by reference in the text of the
applicable statutes or administrative regulations;

CHAPTER 61 23
(i) Administrative hearings exempted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;
(j) Administrative hearings exempted, in whole or in part, pursuant to subsections (4) and (5) of this
section; and
(k) Any administrative hearing which was commenced but not completed prior to July 15, 1996.
(3) The following administrative hearings are exempt from application of this chapter in compliance with 1994
Ky. Acts ch. 382, sec. 19:
(a) Finance and Administration Cabinet
1. Higher Education Assistance Authority
a. Wage garnishment hearings conducted under authority of 20 U.S.C. sec. 1095a and 34
C.F.R. sec. 682.410
b. Offset hearings conducted under authority of 31 U.S.C. sec. 3720A and sec. 3716, and 34
C.F.R. sec. 30.33
2. Department of Revenue
a. Any licensing and bond revocation hearings conducted under the authority of KRS
138.210 to 138.448 and 234.310 to 234.440
b. Any license revocation hearings under KRS 131.630 and 138.130 to 138.205
(b) Cabinet for Health and Family Services
1. Office of the Inspector General
a. Certificate-of-need hearings and licensure conducted under authority of KRS Chapter
216B
b. Licensure revocation hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 216B
2. Department for Community Based Services
a. Supervised placement revocation hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 630
3. Department for Medicaid Services
a. Administrative appeal hearings following an external independent third-party review of a
Medicaid managed care organization's final decision that denies, in whole or in part, a
health care service to an enrollee or a claim for reimbursement to the provider for a health
care service rendered by the provider to an enrollee of the Medicaid managed care
organization, conducted under authority of KRS 205.646
(c) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
1. Department of Kentucky State Police
a. Kentucky State Police Trial Board disciplinary hearings conducted under authority of
KRS Chapter 16
2. Department of Corrections
a. Parole Board hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 439
b. Prison adjustment committee hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 197
c. Prison grievance committee hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapters 196 and
197
3. Department of Juvenile Justice
a. Supervised placement revocation hearings conducted under KRS Chapter 635
(d) Energy and Environment Cabinet
1. Department for Natural Resources
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Surface mining hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 350
b. Oil and gas hearings conducted under the authority of KRS Chapter 353, except for those
conducted by the Kentucky Oil and Gas Conservation Commission pursuant to KRS
353.500 to 353.720
c. Explosives and blasting hearings conducted under the authority of KRS 351.315 to
351.375
2. Department for Environmental Protection
a. Wild River hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 146
b. Water resources hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 151
c. Water plant operator and water well driller hearings conducted under authority of KRS
Chapter 223
d. Environmental protection hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 224
e. Petroleum Storage Tank Environmental Assurance Fund hearings under authority of KRS
Chapter 224
3. Public Service Commission
a. Utility hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapters 74, 278, and 279
(e) Education and Labor Cabinet
1. [Department of Workers' Claims
a. Workers' compensation hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 342
2. ]Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission
a. Occupational safety and health hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 338
2.[3.] Unemployment insurance hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 341
3.[4.] Disability determination hearings conducted under authority of 20 C.F.R. pt. 404
(f) Public Protection Cabinet
1. Board of Claims
a. Liability hearings conducted under authority of KRS 49.020(5) and 49.040 to 49.180
(g) State universities and colleges
1. Student suspension and expulsion hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 164
2. University presidents and faculty removal hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter
164
3. Campus residency hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 164
4. Family Education Rights to Privacy Act hearings conducted under authority of 20 U.S.C. sec.
1232 and 34 C.F.R. sec. 99
5. Federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986 hearings conducted under authority of 42
U.S.C. sec. 11101 to 11115 and KRS Chapter 311
(h) Department of Workers' Claims
1. Workers' compensation hearings conducted under authority of KRS Chapter 342.
(4) Any administrative hearing, or portion thereof, may be certified as exempt by the Attorney General based on
the following criteria:
(a) The provisions of this chapter conflict with any provision of federal law or regulation with which the
agency must comply, or with any federal law or regulation with which the agency must comply to
permit the agency or persons within the Commonwealth to receive federal tax benefits or federal funds
or other benefits;

CHAPTER 61 25
(b) Conformity with the requirement of this chapter from which exemption is sought would be so
unreasonable or so impractical as to deny due process because of undue delay in the conduct of
administrative hearings; or
(c) The hearing procedures represent informal proceedings which are the preliminary stages or the review
stages of a multilevel hearing process, if the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of a
substantially equivalent hearing procedure exempted under subsection (3) of this section are applied at
some level within the multilevel process.
(5) The Attorney General shall not exempt an agency from any requirement of this chapter until the agency
establishes alternative procedures by administrative regulation which, insofar as practical, shall be consistent
with the intent and purpose of this chapter. When regulations for alternative procedures are submitted to the
Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, they shall be accompanied by the request for exemption and
the approval of exemption from the Attorney General. The decision of the Attorney General, whether
affirmative or negative, shall be subject to judicial review in the Franklin Circuit Court within thirty (30) days
of the date of issuance. The court shall not overturn a decision of the Attorney General unless the decision was
arbitrary or capricious or contrary to law.
(6) Except to the extent precluded by another provision of law, a person may waive any procedural right conferred
upon that person by this chapter.
(7) The provisions of KRS 13B.030(2)(b) shall not apply to administrative hearings held under KRS 11A.100 or
18A.095.
Section 13. KRS 151B.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education and Labor Cabinet is hereby created, which shall constitute a cabinet of the state government
within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12. The cabinet shall consist of a secretary and those administrative
bodies and employees as provided by law.
(2) Subject to KRS Chapter 12, the cabinet shall be composed of the major organizational units listed below, units
listed in KRS 12.020, and other departments, divisions, and sections as are from time to time deemed
necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary, which shall include the Office of Legal Services, the Office of Administrative
Services, the Office of Technology Services, the Office of Policy and Audit, the Office of Legislative
Services, the Office of Communications, and the Office of Kentucky Center for Statistics, as follows:
1. The Office of Legal Services shall:
a. Be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050 and 12.210; and
b. Include the Workplace Standards Legal Division and[,] Workforce Development Legal
Division[, and Workers' Claims Legal Division], each of which shall be headed by a
general counsel appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in
accordance with KRS 12.050 and 12.210; and
2. The following agencies and entities are attached to the Office of the Secretary for administrative
purposes only:
a. Early Childhood Advisory Council;
b. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program;
c. Governor's Scholar Program;
d. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics; and
e. Foundation for Adult Education;
(b) [Department of Workers' Claims, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor
and confirmed by the Senate in accordance with KRS 342.228. The department shall be divided for
administrative purposes into the Office of Administrative Law Judges, the Division of Claims
Processing, the Division of Security and Compliance, the Division of Workers' Compensation Funds,
and the Division of Specialist and Medical Services. The Office of Administrative Law Judges shall be
headed by a chief administrative law judge appointed in accordance with KRS 342.230. Each division
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
in the department shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The Workers' Compensation Board shall be attached to the
Department of Workers' Claims for administrative purposes only;
(c) ]Department of Workplace Standards, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040 and shall be divided for administrative purposes into the
Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance, the Division of Occupational Safety and
Health Education and Training, and the Division of Wages and Hours. Each of these divisions shall be
headed by a director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with
KRS 12.050;
(c)[(d)] Office of Unemployment Insurance, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by
the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040;
(d)[(e)] Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission;
(e)[(f)] Department for Libraries and Archives;
(f)[(g)] Office of Educational Programs;
(g)[(h)] Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(h)[(i)] Department for Disability Determination Services, which shall include the:
1. Division of Operations;
2. Division of Support Services;
3. Division of Specialized Cases; and
4. Division of Case Processing; and
(i)[(j)] Department of Workforce Development, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040 who shall report to the secretary. Each office or division in
the department shall be headed by an executive director or division director appointed by the secretary
with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The department shall be composed
of the following offices:
1. Career Development Office;
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation, which shall include the Division of Program Policy and
Support. The division director shall report to the executive director for the Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation;
3. Office of Industry and Apprenticeship Services, which shall include the Division of
Apprenticeship and the Division of Workforce Talent. The division directors shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Industry and Apprenticeship Services;
4. Office of Adult Education;
5. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council, which shall be attached to the department for administrative
purposes only;
6. Division of Technical Assistance; and
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(3) The following agencies are attached to the cabinet for administrative purposes only:
(a) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission;
(b) State Labor Relations Board;
(c) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission;
(d) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board;
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council;
(f) Kentucky Geographic Education Board;
(g) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety;

CHAPTER 61 27
(h) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education;
(i) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority;
(j) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee;
(k) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing;
(l) Kentucky Educational Television;
(m) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee; and
(n) Foundation for Adult Education.
Section 14. KRS 218A.278 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in[For the purposes of] this section:
(a) "Analyze" means to apply scientific and mathematical measures to determine meaningful patterns and
associations in data. "Analyze" includes descriptive analysis to examine historical data, predictive
analysis to examine future probabilities and trends, and prescriptive analysis to examine how future
decisions may impact the population and trends; and
(b) "Pilot program" means a program in a county or set of counties, or a subset or subsets of the population,
as designated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Office of Drug Control Policy for
analyzing the effectiveness of substance abuse treatment services in Kentucky.
(2) The general purpose of this section is to assist in the development of a pilot program to analyze the outcomes
and effectiveness of substance abuse treatment programs in order to ensure that the Commonwealth is:
(a) Addressing appropriate risk and protective factors for substance abuse in a defined population;
(b) Using approaches that have been shown to be effective;
(c) Intervening early at important stages and transitions;
(d) Intervening in appropriate settings and domains; and
(e) Managing programs effectively.
(3) Sources of data for the pilot program shall include, at a minimum, claims under the Kentucky Department for
Medicaid Services, the electronic monitoring system for controlled substances established under KRS
218A.202, and the Department of Workers' Claims[ within the Education and Labor Cabinet].
(4) As funds are available, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Office of Drug Control Policy shall
initiate a pilot program to determine, collect, and analyze performance measurement data for substance abuse
treatment services to determine practices that reduce frequency of relapse, provide better outcomes for
patients, hold patients accountable, and control health costs related to substance abuse.
(5) By December 31, 2016, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Office of Drug Control Policy
shall issue a joint report to the Legislative Research Commission and the Office of the Governor that:
(a) Details the findings of the pilot program;
(b) Includes recommendations based on the pilot program's results for optimizing substance abuse
treatment services; and
(c) Includes recommendations for the continued application of analytics to further augment Kentucky's
approach to fighting substance abuse in the future.
Section 15. KRS 304.13-167 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every workers' compensation insurer shall adhere to a uniform classification system and uniform experience
rating system filed with the commissioner by an advisory organization designated by the commissioner.
(2) Every workers' compensation insurer shall report its experience in accordance with the statistical plans and
other reporting requirements in use by an advisory organization designated by the commissioner.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) A workers' compensation insurer may develop subclassifications of the uniform classification system upon
which rates may be made. These subclassifications and their filing shall be subject to the provisions of this
chapter applicable to filings generally.
(4) A workers' compensation insurer may develop rating plans which identify loss experience as a factor to be
used. These rating plans and their filing shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter applicable to filings
generally.
(5) The commissioner shall disapprove subclassifications, rating plans, or other variations from manual rules filed
by a workers' compensation insurer if the insurer fails to demonstrate that the data thereby produced can be
reported consistent with the uniform classification system and experience rating system and in such a fashion
so as to allow for the application of experience rating filed by the advisory organization.
(6) The commissioner shall approve rating plans for workers' compensation insurance that give specific
identifiable consideration in the setting of rates to employers who implement a drug-free workplace program
pursuant to administrative regulations adopted by the Department of Workers' Claims[ in the Education and
Labor Cabinet]. The plans shall take effect January 1, 2008, shall be actuarially sound, and shall state the
savings anticipated to result from such drug-free workplace programs. The credit shall be at least five percent
(5%) unless the commissioner determines that five percent (5%) is actuarially unsound. The commissioner is
also authorized to develop a schedule of premium credits for workers' compensation insurance for employers
who have safety programs that contain certain criteria for safety programs. The commissioner shall consult
with the commissioner of the Department of Workers' Claims[ in the Education and Labor Cabinet] in setting
such criteria. A drug-free workplace credit under this subsection shall not be available to employers who
receive a credit under KRS 304.13-412 or KRS Chapter 351.
Section 16. KRS 304.20-090 is amended to read as follows:
Any insurer providing workers' compensation insurance coverage for a Kentucky location shall provide proof of
coverage to the commissioner of the Department of Workers' Claims[ in the Education and Labor Cabinet] in
accordance with the requirements of the chapter.
Section 17. KRS 342.1223 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Workers' Compensation Funding Commission is created as an agency of the Commonwealth
for the public purpose of controlling, investing, and managing the funds collected pursuant to KRS 342.122.
(2) The commission shall:
(a) Hold, administer, invest, and reinvest the funds collected pursuant to KRS 342.122 and its other funds
separate and apart from all "state funds" or "public funds," as defined in KRS Chapter 446;
(b) Act as a fiduciary, as defined in KRS Chapter 386, in exercising its power over the funds collected
pursuant to KRS 342.122, and may invest association funds through one (1) or more banks, trust
companies, or other financial institutions with offices in Kentucky in good standing with the
Department of Financial Institutions, in investments described in KRS Chapter 386, except that the
funding commission may, at its discretion, invest in equity securities;
(c) Report to the General Assembly at each even-numbered-year regular session the actuarial soundness
and adequacy of the funding mechanism for the special fund and other programs supported by the
mechanism, including detailed information on the investment of funds and yields thereon;
(d) Recommend to the General Assembly, not later than October 31 of the year prior to each even-
numbered-year regular legislative session, changes deemed necessary in the level of the assessments
imposed in this chapter;
(e) In conjunction with the commissioner[Education and Labor Cabinet], submit to the General Assembly,
not later than October 31 of the year prior to each even-numbered-year regular legislative session, a
proposed budget for the biennium beginning July 1 following the even-numbered-year regular session
of the General Assembly;
(f) In conjunction with the commissioner[Education and Labor Cabinet], provide to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue an annual budget and detailed quarterly financial reports;
(g) Conduct periodic audits, independently or in cooperation with the Department of Workers'
Claims[Education and Labor Cabinet] or the Department of Revenue, of all entities subject to the
assessments imposed in this chapter; and

CHAPTER 61 29
(h) Report monthly to the Committees on Appropriations and Revenue and on Economic Development and
Workforce Investment its monthly expenditures of restricted agency funds and the nature of the
expenditures.
(3) The commission shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes
for which it was established, including, but not limited to, the power:
(a) To sue and be sued, complain, or defend, in its name;
(b) To elect, appoint, or hire officers, agents, and employees, and define their duties and fix their
compensation within the limits of its budget approved by the General Assembly. Notwithstanding any
provision of KRS Chapter 18A to the contrary, officers and employees of the funding commission may
be exempted from the classified service;
(c) To contract for investment counseling, legal, actuarial, auditing, and other professional services in
accordance with the provisions relating to personal service contracts contained in KRS Chapter 45A;
(d) To appoint, hire, and contract with banks, trust companies, and other entities to serve as depositories
and custodians of its investment receipts and other funds;
(e) To take any and all other actions consistent with the purposes of the commission and the provisions of
this chapter; and
(f) To make and promulgate administrative regulations.
(4) The Kentucky Workers' Compensation Funding Commission may utilize the investment expertise and advice
of the Office of Financial Management within the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The Kentucky
Workers' Compensation Funding Commission may procure one (1) or more consulting firms and enter into a
personal service contract with such consulting firms to provide investment advisory, investment counseling, or
investment management services. The Office of Financial Management shall participate in the selection of any
firms for investment services provided, however, the Kentucky Workers' Compensation Funding Commission
shall have the right to make the final decision on the selection of any firms. Notwithstanding any provisions of
this section to the contrary, all contracts for investment advisory, investment counseling, or investment
management services or for the management of assets shall be subject to KRS Chapter 45A. The fees charged
by financial institutions for managing the investments of the funds of the funding commission shall be paid
from the investment earnings of the funds.
(5) The commission shall be attached to the Education and Labor Cabinet for administrative purposes only.
Section 18. The Workers' Claims Legal Division within the Office of Legal Services of the Education and
Labor Cabinet shall be transferred to the Department of Workers' Claims as the Office of General Counsel.
Section 19. Upon the effective date of this Act, all records, files, documents, equipment, staff, supporting
budgets, and any and all unexpended funds associated with the activities of the Department of Workers' Claims when
it was attached to the Education and Labor Cabinet shall be transferred to the Department of Workers' Claims
administratively attached to the Office of the Governor. All administrative regulations, decisions, and actions
promulgated, made, or taken by the Department of Workers' Claims prior to the effective date of this Act that have
not been repealed or rescinded shall continue in effect on or after the effective date of this Act, unless and until they
are amended, repealed, or rescinded by the department after the effective date of this Act.
Section 20. Whereas it is critical to the proper management and administration of the reorganized
Department of Workers' Claims that consolidation take place as soon as possible, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Became law without Governor's signature April 9, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version